Washington statutes.
RCW 10.22.010

When permitted—Exceptions.

When a defendant is prosecuted in a criminal action for a misdemeanor, other than a violation of RCW 9A.48.105, for which the person injured by the act constituting the offense has a remedy by a civil action, the offense may be compromised as provided in RCW 10.22.020, except when it was committed:

(1) By or upon an officer while in the execution of the duties of his or her office;

(2) Riotously;

(3) With an intent to commit a felony; or

(4) By one family or household member against another or by one intimate partner against another as defined in RCW 10.99.020 and was a crime of domestic violence as defined in RCW 10.99.020.

[ 2021 c 215 s 117; 2020 c 29 s 9; 2010 c 8 s 1015; 2008 c 276 s 308; 1999 c 143 s 45; 1989 c 411 s 3; Code 1881 s 1040; 1854 p 115 s 84; RRS s 2126. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 1935; 1873 p 397 s 234; 1854 p 109 s 42; RRS s 1964, now codified as RCW 10.16.135.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective date—2020 c 29: See note following RCW 7.77.060.

Severability—Part headings, subheadings not law—2008 c 276: See notes following RCW 36.28A.200.